Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 2. Management of Ungranted Shores of the Sea, Marsh and Meadowlands.

§ 28.2-1503.
Management of lands.

The Commission shall manage all ungranted shores of the sea, marsh and meadowlands, and all other lands of the Commonwealth for which management duties have been given to the Commission, as steward for the property interests of the Commonwealth. All agencies of the Commonwealth shall cooperate with the Commission and, upon request, shall assist the Commission in the performance of its duties and responsibilities under this chapter.

History.

1995, c. 850.

§ 28.2-1504.
Preparation of management plan.

The Commission shall prepare and implement a plan for the management of the Commonwealth’s ungranted shores of the sea, marsh and meadowlands. The management plan, and any regulations and guidelines promulgated to implement the management plan, shall conserve and protect the shores of the sea, marsh and meadowlands, and the natural values and natural processes associated therewith. To the extent not inconsistent with that goal, the management plan shall also consider the traditional uses of such properties and the promotion of tourism and commerce. Through methods consistent with that goal, the management plan, and any regulations and guidelines promulgated to implement the management plan, shall recognize the use of such properties, where they have been so used in the past, as a commons by the people of the Commonwealth for the purpose of fishing, fowling, hunting, and the taking and catching of oysters and other shellfish. The Commission shall review the management plan every five years.

In developing regulations, guidelines, or management plans under this chapter, the Commission shall consult with the Virginia Coastal Land Management Advisory Council.

History.

1995, c. 850.

§ 28.2-1505.
Virginia Coastal Land Management Advisory Council established.

There is hereby created the Virginia Coastal Land Management Advisory Council. The Council shall advise the Commission on issues relating to the management of ungranted shores of the sea, marsh and meadowlands, and shall advise the Commission on the development of the management plan prepared pursuant to §

28.2-1504

.

The Council shall consist of six members appointed by the Governor, who shall be residents of a county in which there are ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands, and who shall represent tourism and commerce, traditional uses of shores of the sea, marsh and meadowlands, and conservation interests; however, if any private person or entity owns more than fifty percent of the land area of the barrier islands of the Eastern Shore that are privately owned, such person or entity shall be one of such members. In appointing these members, the Governor shall consider recommendations submitted by the boards of supervisors of counties in which the Commission is managing the largest portions of the ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands. The Council shall also include (i) the Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation or his designee, (ii) the Director of the Department of Wildlife Resources or his designee, and (iii) the Commissioner or his designee.

The term of office of each appointed member shall be for three years. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made to fill the unexpired term.

Members shall receive no compensation for their services but shall receive reimbursement for actual expenses.

The Council shall meet at the call of the Commissioner or at least once per year.

History.

1995, c. 850; 2020, c. 958.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection B.

§ 28.2-1506.
Filing of initial inventories; amended or supplemental inventories.

Whenever any privately owned land in any of such counties is to be transferred, and the transferor or the transferee requests clarification as to whether any portion of such land is claimed by the Commonwealth as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands, the Commission shall review the matter, and, if it determines that all or any portion of such land constitutes ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands, the Commission shall file an amended or supplemental inventory as it may deem appropriate. Any such amended or supplemental inventory shall be filed in the same offices as the initial inventory for such area. The Commission shall not prepare or file any such amended or supplemental inventory unless (1) such classification is requested by a transferor or transferee as provided herein, or (2) (a) the federal government has asserted title to any ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands excluding the Wallops Island Naval/Aegis facility and all land adjacent thereto lying to the south that is used for a federal National Wildlife Refuge, (b) both the Governor and Attorney General concur in writing that all or any of the property to which the federal government has asserted title constitutes ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands, and (c) such amended or supplemental inventory only asserts the Commonwealth’s title to the portion of such property that constitutes ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands as concurred in by the Governor and the Attorney General.

History.

1995, c. 850.